District of Columbia statutes.
19-604.08

Capacity of transferor.

The capacity required to make or revoke a transfer on death deed is the same as the capacity required to make a will.

Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-230, § 2(b), 59 DCR 13606

History